Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0421.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 811j. (1) A fund-raising plate or collector plate recognizing childrenâs trust must be of a design as determined by the secretary of state after consultation with the children trust Michigan board created in section 3 of the child abuse and neglect prevention act, 1982 PA 250, MCL 722.603. (2) Fund-raising donations for plates recognizing childrenâs trust collected under sections 811f and 811g must be transferred under section 811h by the secretary of state to the state treasurer, who shall credit the donation money to the childrenâs trust fund created under section 1 of 1982 PA 249, MCL 21.171, for the support and benefit of the children of this state. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. 418. (b) House Bill No. 4805. (c) House Bill No. 4808. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Secretary of the Senate Clerk of the House of Representatives Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor